Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5072YC (3) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âCampus Due Process Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 262C.1 Definitions. 3 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 4 requires: 5 1. âBoardâ means the state board of regents. 6 2. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 7 governed by the board. 8 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 262C.2 Due process policy. 9 The board shall develop and adopt a due process policy that 10 provides, at minimum, all of the following: 11 1. Each institution must affirm and guarantee to all 12 faculty, staff, and students subject to the institutionâs 13 disciplinary procedures all the constitutional rights of due 14 process, with exceptions only accorded if necessary to achieve 15 a significant institutional interest, and if such exceptions 16 are clear, in writing, and justified by a written explanation. 17 2. Each institution must affirm and guarantee that the 18 institution will establish adjudication procedures for faculty, 19 staff, and students with strict adherence to due process 20 protections including but not limited to all of the following: 21 a. The presumption of innocence. 22 b. The right to have relevant facts and charges proved by 23 clear and convincing evidence. 24 c. The right to counsel. 25 d. The right to be told when a spoken conversation pertains 26 to a disciplinary process. 27 e. The right to record all spoken conversations pertaining 28 to a disciplinary process. 29 f. The right to know the charges of which one is accused. 30 g. The right to know of all existing allegations received by 31 college administrators. 32 h. The right to access all evidence including exculpatory 33 evidence. 34 i. The right to clearly and precisely worded definitions of 35 -1- LSB 5072YC (3) 91 je/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ misconduct that follow those used in statutes, administrative 1 rules, or the Iowa court rules, as applicable. 2 j. The right to clearly defined statutes of limitations. 3 k. The right to live hearings where both accusers and 4 witnesses can be questioned and cross-examined. 5 l. The right to speak publicly about any case. 6 m. Protection against double jeopardy for the same charge. 7 3. Each institution must refer all reported actions 8 punishable as a felony immediately to a local law enforcement 9 agency. 10 4. Each institution must require an employee deemed a Title 11 IX responsible employee to have been employed for at least five 12 years in a job where at least fifty percent of hours worked 13 consisted of criminal defense and to have substantial courtroom 14 experience. 15 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 262C.3 Discipline for interference 16 with due process rights. 17 Each institution shall implement a range of disciplinary 18 sanctions for a person under its jurisdiction who substantially 19 interferes with the due process rights of other persons, as 20 described in this chapter. 21 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 262C.4 Public information on due 22 process protections and violations. 23 1. Each institution shall inform all students and employees 24 of the protections afforded to them under this chapter and 25 of the policies the institution has developed and adopted 26 to implement this chapter. The institution shall post 27 this information prominently on its internet site, include 28 this information in materials given to new employees, and 29 provide this information to each student during new student 30 orientation. 31 2. Each institution shall post prominently on its internet 32 site, and submit to the board, an annual report of all 33 violations of due process rights described in this chapter 34 committed by a person under the institutionâs jurisdiction and 35 -2- LSB 5072YC (3) 91 je/ns 2/ 4 H.F. _____ of all consequent disciplinary sanctions. 1 3. The information posted on an institutionâs internet 2 site required by this section must be accessible from the 3 institutionâs internet site home page by use of no more than 4 three links; searchable by keywords and phrases; and accessible 5 to the public without requiring registration or use of a user 6 name, a password, or another user identification. 7 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect December 31, 8 2026. 9